Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.120

Director's powers.

In addition to those powers set forth in RCW 18.235.030, the director or the director's designee has the authority to order restitution to the person harmed by the licensee.

[ 2007 c 256 s 3; 2002 c 86 s 252; 1993 c 260 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.